Maryland, session 2026, HB0431.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
3–108.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0431*

HOUSE BILL 431
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the provisions of
this section are in addition to any other provisions of the Code, pertaining to recordation of
subdivision plats.
(2) This section does not apply in Queen Anne’s County.
(b) (1) If the owner of land in the State subdivides the land for commercial,
industrial, or residential use to be comprised of streets, avenues, lanes, or alleys and lots,
and desires, for the purpose of description and identification, to record a plat of the
subdivision among the land records of the county where the land lies, the clerk of the court
shall accept and record the plat as prescribed in this section.
(2) The clerk may not accept the plat for record until the owner of land
complies with the requirements prescribed in this section.
(c) (1) In this subsection, “coordinate” means a number which determines the
position of any point in a north or south and an east or west direction in relation to any
other point in the same coordinate system.
(2) The plat shall be legible, drawn accurately and to scale and shall be
submitted for recordation [using black ink on transparent mylar or black–line photo
process comparable to original quality that will conform] IN A FORMAT THAT CONFORMS
to archival standards.
(3) The plat shall contain the courses and distances of all lines drawn on
the plat.
(4) With respect to all curved lines, the plat shall show the length of all
radii, arcs, and tangents and the courses and distances of all chords.
(5) The plat shall contain a north arrow which represents and designates
either true or magnetic meridian as of a date specified on the plat or shall be referenced to
a recognized coordinate system within the county.
(6) All courses shown on the plat shall be calculated from the plat meridian.
(7) No distance on the plat may be marked “more or less” except on lines
which begin, terminate, or bind on a [marsh] WETLAND, stream, or any body of water.
(8) (i) The plat shall show the position by coordinates of not less than
four markers set in convenient places within the subdivision [in a manner so that the
position of one marker is visible from the position of one other marker].
(ii) From these markers, [commonly called traverse points,] every
corner and line can be readily calculated and marked on the ground.

HOUSE BILL 431 3
(iii) These markers shall comply with standards that the State Board
for Professional Land Surveyors sets by regulation under § 15–208 of the Business
Occupations and Professions Article.
(9) A certificate stating that the requirement of this subsection, as far as it
concerns the making of the plat and setting of the markers, shall be put on the plat and
signed by the owner of the land shown on the plat to the best of the owner’s knowledge and
by the professional land surveyor or property line surveyor preparing it.
(d) (1) The owner shall mail or deliver three copies of the plat to the clerk.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the fee
is [$5] $25 PER PAGE for each set of plats.
(ii) A fee is not required for plats showing property or rights–of–way
to be acquired or granted by the State Highway Administration.
(iii) The clerk may assess additional fees if required by local law or
ordinance.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.